Idaho, session 2025, S1141.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 23, Title 67, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 67-2341, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
67-2341. PUBLIC CAMPING OR SLEEPING -- PROHIBITIONS. (1) Notwith-
standing any provision of law to the contrary, public camping or sleeping as
provided for in this section shall be unlawful in the state of Idaho. No city
or single countywide highway district as defined in section 40-120, Idaho
Code, shall authorize, permit, or enable public camping or sleeping as that
term is defined in this section on public property, public building grounds,
or public roads or rights-of-way within the jurisdiction of the city or the
single countywide highway district. The provisions of this section shall
not apply to or affect policies, rules, statutes, or leases regarding endow-
ment lands, department of parks and recreation lands, or department of fish
and game lands. The prohibitions against public camping or sleeping pro-
vided for in this section shall not apply to drivers of commercial vehicles
or commercial motor vehicles as defined in section 49-123(2)(d), Idaho Code.
(2) For purposes of this section, "public camping or sleeping" means
lodging or residing in a temporary outdoor habitation used as a dwelling,
lodging, or living space, which includes sitting, lying, or sleeping for a
prolonged amount of time, and may be evidenced by the erection of a tent or
other temporary shelter, including a motor vehicle as defined in section
39-6501, Idaho Code, or a recreational vehicle as defined in section 49-119,
Idaho Code, and may include but is not limited to the presence of bedding,
pillows, cooking appliances, heat sources, the storage of personal belong-
ings or food, or digging or earth breaking.
(3) Nothing in this section shall prohibit or prevent overnight camp-
ing for recreational or educational purposes on property designated for such
purpose, authorized specific temporary events or activities, or authorized
overnight parking at Idaho rest areas or private businesses in compliance
with applicable established rules. Nothing in this section shall prohibit
or restrict a city or single countywide highway district from maintaining
and enforcing ordinances, rules, or laws that prohibit loitering, overnight
camping, or other similar activities.
(4) The attorney general shall have the power to bring a civil action
in any court of competent jurisdiction against any city or single county-


wide highway district to enjoin the city or countywide highway district from
knowingly violating the provisions of this section. The attorney general
may recover reasonable expenses incurred in any civil action brought under
this section, including court costs, reasonable attorney's fees, investiga-
tive costs, witness fees, and deposition costs. Any city or single county-
wide highway district that violates the provisions of this section may be as-
sessed a civil penalty of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) for
each violation. Cities or single countywide highway districts against whom
civil penalties are assessed are liable for reasonable attorney's fees.
(5) The provisions of this section shall apply only to property within
city limits for cities with a population of greater than or equal to one hun-
dred thousand (100,000).
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.